Utah statutes.
53C-3-104.   Disposition of reservoir land grant revenue.
Money from the sale or management of land selected under the Reservoir Land
Grant for the establishment of permanent water reservoirs and water
development and conservation projects for irrigation purposes shall be
deposited in the Water Resources Construction Fund created in Section 73-10-8.
